Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2162] Community colleges special
fund. (a) Section [304A-2003] notwithstanding, there is established a
community colleges special fund to receive, disburse, and account for funds of
programs and activities of the community colleges, including but not limited to
off-campus programs, summer session programs, overseas programs, evening
sessions, study abroad, exchange programs, cultural enrichment programs, and
consultative services that help make available the resources of the community
colleges to the communities they serve.

(b) The special fund may include deposits
from:

(1) The University of Hawaii tuition and fees special
fund established in section [304A-2153];

(2) Tuition, fees, and charges for affiliated
instructional, training, and public service courses and programs; and

(3) Fees, fines, and other money collected for:

(A) Student health;

(B) Transcript and diploma;

(C) Library;

(D) Facility use;

(E) Child care;

(F) Auxiliary enterprises;

(G) Alumni; and

(H) Other related activities. [L 2006, c 75,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next